North Carolina, session 2025, HB735.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 136-189.10(2)e. reads as rewritten:
"e. Public transportation service not included in subdivision (3) or (4) of
this section. This sub-subdivision includes commuter rail, intercity
rail, and light rail. Nothing in this sub-subdivision shall be construed
as authorizing total State funding in excess of the maximum
established in sub-subdivision g. of subdivision (3) of this section for
commuter rail and light rail projects."
SECTION 2. G.S. 136-189.10(3)g. reads as rewritten:
"g. Public transportation service that spans two or more counties and that
serves more than one municipality. Programmed funds pursuant to this
sub-subdivision shall not exceed ten percent (10%) of any distribution
region allocation. This sub-subdivision includes commuter rail,
intercity rail, and light rail. Total State funding for a commuter rail or
light rail project shall not exceed the lesser of ten percent (10%) of the
distribution region allocation or ten percent (10%) of the estimated
total project costs used during the prioritization scoring process. The
State shall not be responsible or liable for any project costs in excess
of the maximum established under this sub-subdivision. Any
agreement entered into by the State to fund a commuter rail or light
rail project shall include language setting out the limitations set forth
in this sub-subdivision."
SECTION 3. G.S. 136-189.10(4) is amended by adding a new sub-subdivision to
read:
"i. Public transportation service that spans four or more counties and that
serves more than three municipalities."
SECTION 4. G.S. 136-189.11(d1) is repealed.
SECTION 5. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H735-v-1*